Maryland, session 2025, SB1014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1014*

SENATE BILL 1014
(l–1) (1) “Central committee” means a political committee for a political party
established under Title 4 of this article.
(2) “Central committee” includes a political committee for a political party
that engages in campaign finance activity that is subject to Title 13 of this article.
(hh) “Political party” means an organized group that is qualified as a political party
in accordance with Title 4 of this article.
5–204.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PARTY OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF A MEMBER OF
A COUNTY CENTRAL COMMITTEE OF A POLITICAL PARTY.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
SIMULTANEOUSLY HOLDS AN ELECTED PUBLIC OFFICE AND HOLDS THE OFFICE OF
DELEGATE TO THE NATIONAL PRESIDENTIAL NOMINATING CONVENTION.
[(a)] (C) An individual simultaneously may not be a candidate for more than one
ELECTED public office.
[(b)] (D) An individual simultaneously may not be a candidate for more than one
PARTY office [of a political party].
[(c)] (E) Unless otherwise prohibited by rule of the applicable political party, an
individual simultaneously may be a candidate for a party office and [a] AN ELECTED public
office.
(F) AN INDIVIDUAL SIMULTANEOUSLY MAY NOT HOLD A PARTY OFFICE AND
AN ELECTED PUBLIC OFFICE.
8–501.
(a) Delegates and alternate delegates to the national presidential nominating
convention of a political party shall be selected as provided in the national party rules of
the party.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.